Utah statutes.
78B-6-607.   Judgment against director of corporation -- Of induction in
favor of person entitled.
When the action is against a director of a corporation, and the court finds
that, at the election, either illegal votes were received or legal votes were
rejected, or both, sufficient to change the result, the court may order the
defendant removed, and judgment of induction entered in favor of the person
who was entitled to be declared elected at the election.
